Idaho, session 2026, S1371.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-145, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-145. IDAHO STUDENT SAFETY AND EDUCATOR DISCLOSURE ACT. (1) The
legislature finds that student safety is a paramount responsibility of the
state and that uniform statewide reporting and disclosure requirements in
the hiring of school employees is necessary to protect good faith disclo-
sures and prevent concealment of misconduct against a student.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Covered individual" means any school personnel.
(b) "Educational entity" means any public school district, public
charter school, private school, the state department of education,
or any other entity that provides K-12 education and receives public
funds, including any program, school, or activity operated by or under
the authority of such entity.
(c) "Misconduct" means any conduct by a covered individual that vio-
lates the code of ethics for Idaho professional educators relating to
educator-student relationships.
(d) "Pending investigation" means any internal, administrative, reg-
ulatory, or criminal investigation that has been initiated and has not
reached a final disposition.
(3) An educational entity shall not conduct an internal review or in-
vestigation of alleged abuse, abandonment, or neglect of a child in lieu of
reporting to law enforcement as required by section 16-1605, Idaho Code.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit an educational
entity from taking administrative action or conducting an internal review
or investigation after a report has been made in compliance with section
16-1605, Idaho Code.
(4) Prior to hiring an employee, an educational entity shall obtain
disclosure statements from applicants and all educational employers or ed-
ucational contractors with the applicant for the prior ten (10) years and
shall specifically request information about any pending investigations,
resignations during investigations, and disciplinary actions involving the
applicant. Any applicant who makes a material misrepresentation or willful
omission regarding such disclosure statements or information required by


this subsection shall be subject to immediate termination of employment or
recission of such applicant's employment contract.
(5) An educational entity or administrator that knowingly withholds or
falsifies a disclosure statement required under this section shall be sub-
ject to administrative penalties, civil liability, and professional disci-
pline.
(6) Educational entities and administrators have immunity from civil
liability for disclosures made in good faith under this section.
(7) Any resignation, termination, or administrative leave during an
investigation of misconduct by a covered individual shall be referred to the
Idaho professional standards commission. Upon referral, the educational
entity shall confirm that the covered individual's certification status is
accurately reflected in the state department of education's certification
lookup application.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.